Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202518-2103
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Community Development Law, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Affordable housing means (a) workforce housing, (b) housing targeted for households earning less than one hundred fifty percent of the median income for the county in which such housing is located, or (c) housing under section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code;

(2) Area of operation means and includes the area within the corporate limits of the city and such land outside the city as may come within the purview of sections 18-2123 and 18-2123.01;

(3) Authority means any community redevelopment authority created pursuant to section 18-2102.01 and any community development agency created pursuant to section 18-2101.01 and does not include a limited community redevelopment authority;

(4) Blighted area means an area (a) which, by reason of the presence of a substantial number of deteriorated or deteriorating structures, existence of defective or inadequate street layout, faulty lot layout in relation to size, adequacy, accessibility, or usefulness, insanitary or unsafe conditions, deterioration of site or other improvements, diversity of ownership, tax or special assessment delinquency exceeding the fair value of the land, defective or unusual conditions of title, improper subdivision, obsolete or no platting, or the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or any combination of such factors, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of the community, retards the provision of housing accommodations, or constitutes an economic or social liability and is detrimental to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare in its present condition and use and (b) in which there is at least one of the following conditions: (i) Unemployment in the designated area is at least one hundred twenty percent of the state or national average; (ii) the average age of the residential or commercial units in the area is at least forty years; (iii) more than half of the plotted and subdivided property in an area is unimproved land that has been within the city for forty years and has remained unimproved during that time; (iv) the per capita income of the area is lower than the average per capita income of the city or village in which the area is designated; (v) the area has had either stable or decreasing population based on the last two decennial censuses; or (vi) less than twenty percent of the housing in the area is affordable housing. In no event shall a city of the metropolitan, primary, or first class designate more than thirty-five percent of the city as blighted, a city of the second class shall not designate an area larger than fifty percent of the city as blighted, and a village shall not designate an area larger than one hundred percent of the village as blighted. A redevelopment project involving a formerly used defense site as authorized under section 18-2123.01, any area which is located within a good life district established under the Good Life Transformational Projects Act, and any area declared to be an extremely blighted area under section 18-2101.02 shall not count towards the percentage limitations contained in this subdivision;

(5) Bonds means any bonds, including refunding bonds, notes, interim certificates, debentures, or other obligations issued pursuant to the Community Development Law except for bonds issued pursuant to section 18-2142.04;

(6) Business means any private business located in an enhanced employment area;

(7) City means any city or incorporated village in the state;

(8) Clerk means the clerk of the city or village;

(9) Community redevelopment area means a substandard and blighted area which the community redevelopment authority designates as appropriate for a redevelopment project;

(10) Employee means a person employed at a business as a result of a redevelopment project;

(11) Employer-provided health benefit means any item paid for by the employer in total or in part that aids in the cost of health care services, including, but not limited to, health insurance, health savings accounts, and employer reimbursement of health care costs;

(12) Enhanced employment area means an area not exceeding six hundred acres (a) within a community redevelopment area which is designated by an authority as eligible for the imposition of an occupation tax or (b) not within a community redevelopment area as may be designated under section 18-2142.04;

(13) Equivalent employees means the number of employees computed by (a) dividing the total hours to be paid in a year by (b) the product of forty times the number of weeks in a year;

(14) Extremely blighted area means a substandard and blighted area in which: (a) The average rate of unemployment in the area during the period covered by the most recent American Community Survey 5-Year Estimate is at least two hundred percent of the average rate of unemployment in the state during the same period; and (b) the average poverty rate in the area exceeds twenty percent for the total federal census tract or tracts or federal census block group or block groups in the area;

(15) Federal government means the United States of America, or any agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America;

(16) Governing body or local governing body means the city council, board of trustees, or other legislative body charged with governing the municipality;

(17) Limited community redevelopment authority means a community redevelopment authority created pursuant to section 18-2102.01 having only one single specific limited pilot project authorized;

(18) Mayor means the mayor of the city or chairperson of the board of trustees of the village;

(19) New investment means the value of improvements to real estate made in an enhanced employment area by a developer or a business;

(20) Number of new employees means the number of equivalent employees that are employed at a business as a result of the redevelopment project during a year that are in excess of the number of equivalent employees during the year immediately prior to the year that a redevelopment plan is adopted;

(21) Obligee means any bondholder, agent, or trustee for any bondholder, or lessor demising to any authority, established pursuant to section 18-2102.01, property used in connection with a redevelopment project, or any assignee or assignees of such lessor's interest or any part thereof, and the federal government when it is a party to any contract with such authority;

(22) Occupation tax means a tax imposed under section 18-2142.02;

(23) Person means any individual, firm, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, company, association, joint-stock association, or body politic and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other similar representative thereof;

(24) Public body means the state or any municipality, county, township, board, commission, authority, district, or other political subdivision or public body of the state;

(25) Real property means all lands, including improvements and fixtures thereon, and property of any nature appurtenant thereto, or used in connection therewith, and every estate, interest and right, legal or equitable, therein, including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage, or otherwise, and the indebtedness secured by such liens;

(26) Redeveloper means any person, partnership, or public or private corporation or agency which enters or proposes to enter into a redevelopment contract;

(27) Redevelopment contract means a contract entered into between an authority and a redeveloper for the redevelopment of an area in conformity with a redevelopment plan;

(28) Redevelopment plan means a plan, as it exists from time to time for one or more community redevelopment areas, or for a redevelopment project, which (a) conforms to the general plan for the municipality as a whole and (b) is sufficiently complete to indicate such land acquisition, demolition and removal of structures, redevelopment, improvements, and rehabilitation as may be proposed to be carried out in the community redevelopment area, zoning and planning changes, if any, land uses, maximum densities, and building requirements;

(29) Redevelopment project means any work or undertaking in one or more community redevelopment areas: (a) To acquire substandard and blighted areas or portions thereof, including lands, structures, or improvements the acquisition of which is necessary or incidental to the proper clearance, development, or redevelopment of such substandard and blighted areas; (b) to clear any such areas by demolition or removal of existing buildings, structures, streets, utilities, or other improvements thereon and to install, construct, or reconstruct streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds, public spaces, public parking facilities, sidewalks or moving sidewalks, convention and civic centers, bus stop shelters, lighting, benches or other similar furniture, trash receptacles, shelters, skywalks and pedestrian and vehicular overpasses and underpasses, enhancements to structures in the redevelopment plan area which exceed minimum building and design standards in the community and prevent the recurrence of substandard and blighted conditions, and any other necessary public improvements essential to the preparation of sites for uses in accordance with a redevelopment plan; (c) to sell, lease, or otherwise make available land in such areas for residential, recreational, commercial, industrial, or other uses, including parking or other facilities functionally related or subordinate to such uses, or for public use or to retain such land for public use, in accordance with a redevelopment plan; and may also include the preparation of the redevelopment plan, the planning, survey, and other work incident to a redevelopment project and the preparation of all plans and arrangements for carrying out a redevelopment project; (d) to dispose of all real and personal property or any interest in such property, or assets, cash, or other funds held or used in connection with residential, recreational, commercial, industrial, or other uses, including parking or other facilities functionally related or subordinate to such uses, or any public use specified in a redevelopment plan or project, except that such disposition shall be at its fair value for uses in accordance with the redevelopment plan; (e) to acquire real property in a community redevelopment area which, under the redevelopment plan, is to be repaired or rehabilitated for dwelling use or related facilities, repair or rehabilitate the structures, and resell the property; (f) to carry out plans for a program of voluntary or compulsory repair, rehabilitation, or demolition of buildings in accordance with the redevelopment plan; and (g) to carry out construction of affordable housing;

(30) Redevelopment project valuation means the valuation for assessment of the taxable real property in a redevelopment project last certified for the year prior to the effective date of the provision authorized in section 18-2147;

(31) Rural community means any municipality in a county with a population of fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census;

(32) Substandard area means an area in which less than twenty percent of the housing is affordable housing or in which there is a predominance of buildings or improvements, whether nonresidential or residential in character, which, by reason of dilapidation, deterioration, age or obsolescence, inadequate provision for ventilation, light, air, sanitation, or open spaces, high density of population and overcrowding, or the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or any combination of such factors, is conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant mortality, juvenile delinquency, and crime, (which cannot be remedied through construction of prisons), and is detrimental to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare; and

(33) Workforce housing means:

(a) Housing that meets the needs of today's working families;

(b) Housing that is attractive to new residents considering relocation to a rural community;

(c) Owner-occupied housing units that cost not more than two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars to construct or rental housing units that cost not more than two hundred thousand dollars per unit to construct. For purposes of this subdivision (c), housing unit costs shall be updated annually by the Department of Economic Development based upon the most recent increase or decrease in the Producer Price Index for all commodities, published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics;

(d) Owner-occupied and rental housing units for which the cost to substantially rehabilitate exceeds fifty percent of a unit's assessed value; and

(e) Upper-story housing.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 3, p. 797;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1603;

Laws 1957, c. 52, § 4, p. 249;

Laws 1961, c. 61, § 3, p. 227;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2603;

Laws 1965, c. 74, § 3, p. 303;

Laws 1969, c. 106, § 2, p. 488;

Laws 1973, LB 299, § 3;

Laws 1979, LB 158, § 2;

Laws 1980, LB 986, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 1084, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 143;

Laws 1997, LB 875, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB562, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB729, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB66, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB1012, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB496, § 2;

Laws 2018, LB874, § 7;

Laws 2019, LB86, § 3;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 173;

Laws 2021, LB131, § 18;

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 56;

Laws 2025, LB288, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB355, § 3.

Good Life Transformational Projects Act, see section 77-4401.